Tennessee, session 114, SB2605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-102-143(e)(1), is amended by
deleting "forty-five (45) days" and substituting "nine (9) months".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2605
008745
- 1 -